Illinois, session 104th, HB2361.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5adding Section 5.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/5.5 new)7    Sec. 5.5. French Heritage Month. The month of March of 8each year is designated as French Heritage Month to be 9observed throughout the State as a month set apart to promote 10the study of French language and the culture of 11French-speaking people.